Maine, session 132, LD2159.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §2302, sub-§1-A, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 413, §2, is
amended to read:
1-A. School bus crossing arms. A school bus of model year 2021 or newer must be
equipped with a school bus crossing arm.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §2306-A is enacted to read:
§2306-A. Required use of school bus crossing arm
1. Required use. The operator of a school bus equipped with a school bus crossing
arm shall activate the school bus crossing arm while the school bus is stopped to receive or
discharge passengers.
2. Violation. A person commits a Class E crime if that person, while operating a
school bus, fails to activate a school bus crossing arm as required by subsection 1.
3. Suspension. On conviction of an operator of failure to activate a school bus
crossing arm, the Secretary of State shall revoke the operator's school bus operator
endorsement issued pursuant to section 2303 for a period of not less than 2 years.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.